Maryland, session 2025, SB0917.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
12–1402.
[This subtitle does] SECTIONS 12–1403 AND 12–1404 OF THIS SUBTITLE DO not
apply to a merchant processing agreement between a credit card processor and a business
entity:
(1) That may be terminated without assessment of fees, fines, penalties, or
liquidated damages; or
(2) If at the time of entry into the merchant processing agreement, the
business entity employs 50 or more employees or reasonably estimates that it will generate
more than $2,000,000 in credit card or electronic commerce transactions each year.
12–1405.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ACQUIRER BANK” MEANS A MEMBER OF A PAYMENT CARD
NETWORK THAT CONTRACTS WITH A MERCHANT OR PROCESSOR FOR THE
SETTLEMENT OF ELECTRONIC PAYMENT TRANSACTIONS.

SENATE BILL 917 3
(3) “AUTHORIZATION” MEANS THE PROCESS THROUGH WHICH A
MERCHANT REQUESTS APPROVAL FOR AN ELECTRONIC PAYMENT TRANSACTION
FROM THE ISSUER.
(4) “CLEARANCE” MEANS THE PROCESS OF TRANSMITTING FINAL
TRANSACTION DATA FROM A MERCHANT TO AN ISSUER FOR POSTING TO THE
CARDHOLDER’S ACCOUNT AND THE CALCULATION OF FEES AND CHARGES,
INCLUDING INTERCHANGE FEES, THAT APPLY TO THE ISSUER AND THE MERCHANT.
(5) “CREDIT CARD” MEANS A CARD, PLATE, COUPON BOOK, OR ANY
OTHER CREDIT DEVICE EXISTING FOR THE PURPOSE OF OBTAINING MONEY,
PROPERTY, LABOR, OR SERVICES ON CREDIT.
(6) (I) “DEBIT CARD” MEANS A CARD OR OTHER PAYMENT CODE
OR DEVICE ISSUED OR APPROVED FOR USE THROUGH A PAYMENT CARD NETWORK
TO DEBIT AN ASSET ACCOUNT, REGARDLESS OF THE PURPOSE FOR WHICH THE
ACCOUNT IS ESTABLISHED OR WHETHER AUTHORIZATION IS BASED ON A
SIGNATURE, A PERSONAL IDENTIFICATION NUMBER, OR ANY OTHER MEANS.
(II) “DEBIT CARD” INCLUDES A GENERAL USE PREPAID CARD,
AS DEFINED IN 15 U.S.C. § 16931–1.
(III) “DEBIT CARD” DOES NOT INCLUDE A PAPER CHECK.
(7) “ELECTRONIC PAYMENT TRANSACTION” MEANS A TRANSACTION
IN WHICH A PERSON USES A DEBIT CARD, A CREDIT CARD, OR ANY OTHER PAYMENT
CODE OR DEVICE ISSUED OR APPROVED THROUGH A PAYMENT CARD NETWORK TO
DEBIT A DEPOSIT ACCOUNT OR USE A LINE OF CREDIT, REGARDLESS OF WHETHER
THE AUTHORIZATION IS BASED ON A SIGNATURE, A PERSONAL IDENTIFICATION
NUMBER, OR ANY OTHER MEANS.
(8) “GRATUITY” MEANS A VOLUNTARY MONETARY CONTRIBUTION TO
AN EMPLOYEE FROM A GUEST, PATRON, OR CUSTOMER IN CONNECTION WITH
SERVICES RENDERED.
(9) “INTERCHANGE FEE” MEANS A FEE ESTABLISHED, CHARGED, OR
RECEIVED BY A PAYMENT CARD NETWORK FOR THE PURPOSE OF COMPENSATING
THE ISSUER FOR ITS INVOLVEMENT IN AN ELECTRONIC PAYMENT TRANSACTION.
(10) “ISSUER” MEANS A PERSON ISSUING A DEBIT CARD OR CREDIT
CARD OR THE ISSUER’S AGENT.

SENATE BILL 917
(11) “MERCHANT” MEANS A PERSON THAT COLLECTS AND REMITS A
TAX.
(12) “PAYMENT CARD NETWORK” MEANS AN ENTITY THAT:
(I) DIRECTLY OR THROUGH LICENSED MEMBERS,
PROCESSORS, OR AGENTS PROVIDES THE PROPRIETARY SERVICES,
INFRASTRUCTURE, AND SOFTWARE TO ROUTE INFORMATION AND DATA FOR THE
PURPOSE OF CONDUCTING ELECTRONIC PAYMENT TRANSACTION AUTHORIZATION,
CLEARANCE, AND SETTLEMENT; AND
(II) A MERCHANT USES TO ACCEPT AS A FORM OF PAYMENT A
BRAND OF DEBIT CARD, CREDIT CARD, OR ANY OTHER DEVICE THAT MAY BE USED
TO CARRY OUT ELECTRONIC PAYMENT TRANSACTIONS.
(13) “PROCESSOR” MEANS AN ENTITY THAT FACILITATES, SERVICES,
PROCESSES, OR MANAGES THE DEBIT OR CREDIT AUTHORIZATION, BILLING,
TRANSFER, PAYMENT PROCEDURE, OR SETTLEMENT WITH RESPECT TO ANY
ELECTRONIC PAYMENT TRANSACTION.
(14) “SETTLEMENT” MEANS THE PROCESS OF TRANSMITTING SALES
INFORMATION TO THE ISSUING BANK FOR COLLECTION AND REIMBURSEMENT OF
FUNDS TO THE MERCHANT AND CALCULATING AND REPORTING THE NET
TRANSACTION AMOUNT TO THE ISSUER AND MERCHANT FOR AN ELECTRONIC
PAYMENT TRANSACTION THAT IS CLEARED.
(15) “TAX” MEANS THE SALES AND USE TAX IMPOSED UNDER TITLE 11
OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(16) “TAX AND GRATUITY DOCUMENTATION” MEANS DOCUMENTATION
THAT IS SUFFICIENT TO ALLOW THE PAYMENT CARD NETWORK TO DETERMINE THE
AMOUNT OF TAX AND GRATUITY INCLUDED IN THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF THE
ELECTRONIC PAYMENT TRANSACTION.
(B) (1) A MERCHANT MAY REQUEST THAT AN ISSUER, A PAYMENT CARD
NETWORK, AN ACQUIRER BANK, OR A PROCESSOR EXCLUDE THE AMOUNT OF TAX OR
GRATUITY INCLUDED IN AN ELECTRONIC PAYMENT TRANSACTION FROM THE
AMOUNT ON WHICH AN INTERCHANGE FEE IS CHARGED BY TRANSMITTING THE TAX
AND GRATUITY DOCUMENTATION AS PART OF THE AUTHORIZATION OR SETTLEMENT
PROCESS FOR AN ELECTRONIC PAYMENT TRANSACTION.
(2) IF A MERCHANT TRANSMITS THE TAX AND GRATUITY
DOCUMENTATION AS PART OF THE AUTHORIZATION OR SETTLEMENT PROCESS FOR

SENATE BILL 917 5
THE ELECTRONIC PAYMENT TRANSACTION, AN ISSUER, A PAYMENT CARD NETWORK,
AN ACQUIRER BANK, OR A PROCESSOR SHALL EXCLUDE THE AMOUNT OF TAX AND
GRATUITY INCLUDED IN THE ELECTRONIC PAYMENT TRANSACTION FROM THE
AMOUNT ON WHICH AN INTERCHANGE FEE IS CHARGED.
(3) (I) A MERCHANT THAT DOES NOT TRANSMIT THE TAX AND
GRATUITY DOCUMENTATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION MAY SUBMIT TAX AND GRATUITY DOCUMENTATION FOR THE
ELECTRONIC PAYMENT TRANSACTION TO THE ACQUIRER BANK OR ITS DESIGNEE
WITHIN 180 DAYS AFTER THE DATE OF THE ELECTRONIC PAYMENT TRANSACTION.
(II) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER A MERCHANT SUBMITS THE TAX
AND GRATUITY DOCUMENTATION UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH,
THE ISSUER SHALL CREDIT TO THE MERCHANT THE AMOUNT OF INTERCHANGE FEES
CHARGED ON THE AMOUNT OF TAX AND GRATUITY INCLUDED IN THE ELECTRONIC
PAYMENT TRANSACTION.
(4) THIS SECTION DOES NOT CREATE LIABILITY FOR A PAYMENT
CARD NETWORK REGARDING THE ACCURACY OF THE TAX AND GRATUITY
DOCUMENTATION REPORTED BY THE MERCHANT.
(5) (I) AN ISSUER, A PAYMENT CARD NETWORK, AN ACQUIRER
BANK, OR A PROCESSOR THAT DOES NOT EXCLUDE THE AMOUNT OF TAX AND
GRATUITY INCLUDED IN AN ELECTRONIC PAYMENT TRANSACTION AS REQUIRED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION IS SUBJECT TO A CIVIL PENALTY OF
$1,000 FOR EACH TRANSACTION.
(II) AN ISSUER THAT DOES NOT CREDIT THE MERCHANT THE
AMOUNT OF INTERCHANGE FEES CHARGED ON THE AMOUNT OF TAX AND GRATUITY
INCLUDED IN THE ELECTRONIC PAYMENT TRANSACTION AS REQUIRED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION IS SUBJECT TO A CIVIL PENALTY OF $1,000
FOR EACH TRANSACTION.
(C) AN ISSUER, A PAYMENT CARD NETWORK, AN ACQUIRER BANK, OR A
PROCESSOR MAY NOT ALTER OR MANIPULATE THE COMPUTATION AND IMPOSITION
OF INTERCHANGE FEES BY INCREASING THE RATE OR AMOUNT OF THE FEES
APPLICABLE TO OR IMPOSED ON THE PORTION OF A CREDIT OR DEBIT CARD
TRANSACTION THAT IS NOT ATTRIBUTABLE TO TAXES OR GRATUITIES FOR A
MERCHANT THAT MAKES A REQUEST UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(D) (1) AN ENTITY OTHER THAN A MERCHANT MAY NOT DISTRIBUTE,
EXCHANGE, TRANSFER, DISSEMINATE, OR USE ELECTRONIC PAYMENT
TRANSACTION DATA EXCEPT:

SENATE BILL 917
(I) TO FACILITATE OR PROCESS THE ELECTRONIC PAYMENT
TRANSACTION;
(II) TO MONITOR FOR, DETECT, OR PREVENT FRAUD;
(III) TO SUPPORT A LOYALTY, REWARDS, OR PROMOTIONAL
OFFERING;
(IV) TO TAILOR PRODUCTS AND SERVICES TO SERVE CUSTOMER
NEEDS; OR
(V) AS OTHERWISE REQUIRED BY LAW.
(2) A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBSECTION IS AN UNFAIR, ABUSIVE, OR
DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE WITHIN THE MEANING OF TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE
AND IS SUBJECT TO THE ENFORCEMENT AND PENALTY PROVISIONS CONTAINED IN
TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE.
13–301.
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
(14) Violation of a provision of:
(xliv) Title 14, Subtitle 49 of this article; [or]
(xlv) Section 12–6C–09.1 of the Health Occupations Article; or
(XLVI) SECTION 12–1405 OF THIS ARTICLE; OR
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.